Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1930
Rules and regulations.

The department
may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nursing Facility
Quality Assurance Assessment Act.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 30.